Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.695

Planning regulations—Copies provided to county assessor.

By July 31, 1997, a first-class city planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall provide to the county assessor a copy of the first-class city's comprehensive plan and development regulations in effect on July 1st of that year and shall thereafter provide any amendments to the plan and regulations that were adopted before July 31st of each following year.

[ 1996 c 254 s 2.]